Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Alaska Gasline Inducement Act License.
Sec. 43.90.260.
Expedited review and action by state agencies.

A review conducted and action taken by a state agency relating to the project shall be expedited in a manner consistent with the completion of the necessary approvals in accordance with this chapter.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, a state agency may not include in any project certificate, right-of-way, permit, or other authorization issued to the licensee a term or condition that is not required by law if the coordinator determines that the term or condition would prevent or impair in any significant respect the expeditious construction and operation or expansion of the project.

Unless required by law, a state agency may not add to, amend, or abrogate any certificate, right-of-way, permit, or other authorization issued to a licensee if the coordinator determines that the action would prevent or impair in any significant respect the expeditious construction, operation, or expansion of the project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)